Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.250.050

Student access to online courses and online learning programs—Policies and procedures—Course credit—Dissemination of information—Development of local or regional online learning programs.

(1) By August 31, 2010, all school district boards of directors shall develop policies and procedures regarding student access to online courses and online learning programs. The policies and procedures shall include but not be limited to: Student eligibility criteria; the types of online courses available to students through the school district; the methods districts will use to support student success, which may include a local advisor; when the school district will and will not pay course fees and other costs; the granting of high school credit; and a process for students and parents or guardians to formally acknowledge any course taken for which no credit is given. The policies and procedures shall take effect beginning with the 2010-11 school year. School districts shall submit their policies to the superintendent of public instruction by September 15, 2010. By December 1, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize the school district policies regarding student access to online courses and submit a report to the legislature.

(2) School districts must award credit and grades for online high school courses successfully completed by a student that meet the school district's graduation requirements and are provided by an approved online provider.

(3) School districts shall provide students with information regarding online courses that are available through the school district. The information shall include the types of information described in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) When developing local or regional online learning programs, school districts shall incorporate into the program design the approval criteria developed by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.250.020.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 506; 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 11; 2009 c 542 s 6.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 34: See RCW 28A.232.005.